North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44A. Statutory Liens and Charges.
Article 2. Statutory Liens on Real Property.
§ 44A-13.
Action to enforce claim of lien on real property.

Where and When Action Commenced. — An action to enforce a claim of lien on real property may be commenced in any county where venue is otherwise proper. No such action may be commenced later than 180 days after the last furnishing of labor or materials at the site of the improvement by the person claiming the claim of lien on real property. If the title to the real property against which the claim of lien on real property is asserted is by law vested in a receiver or is subject to the control of the bankruptcy court, the claim of lien on real property shall be enforced in accordance with the orders of the court having jurisdiction over said real property. The filing of a proof of claim with a receiver or in bankruptcy and the filing of a notice of lis pendens in each county where the real property subject to the claim of lien on real property is located within the time required by this section satisfies the requirement for the commencement of a civil action.

Judgment. — A judgment enforcing a lien under this Article may be entered for the principal amount shown to be due, not exceeding the principal amount stated in the claim of lien enforced thereby. The judgment shall direct a sale of the real property subject to the lien thereby enforced.

Notice of Action. — In order for the sale under G.S. 44A-14(a) to pass all title and interest of the owner to the purchaser good against all claims or interests recorded, filed or arising after the first furnishing of labor or materials at the site of the improvement by the person claiming the claim of lien on real property, a notice of lis pendens shall be filed in each county in which the real property subject to the claim of lien on real property is located except the county in which the action is commenced. The notice of lis pendens shall be filed within the time provided in subsection (a) of this section for the commencement of the action by the lien claimant. If neither an action nor a notice of lis pendens is filed in accordance with this section, the judgment entered in the action enforcing the claim of lien on real property shall not direct a sale of the real property subject to the claim of lien on real property enforced thereby nor be entitled to any priority under the provisions of G.S. 44A-14(a), but shall be entitled only to those priorities accorded by law to money judgments.

Former Owner Not a Necessary Party to Action. — In an action brought under this section, a former owner of the improved property at the time the lien arose, who holds no ownership interest in the property at the time the action is commenced and against whom the plaintiff seeks no relief, is not a necessary party to the action.

Subsequent Purchaser and Lender Not Necessary or Proper Parties to Action Filed After Claim of Lien Is Discharged. — If a claim of lien on real property filed under this Article is discharged pursuant to G.S. 44A-16(a)(5) or G.S. 44A-16(a)(6) prior to the filing of an action to enforce the claim of lien under this section, then neither a subsequent purchaser of the real property upon which the lien is claimed nor the subsequent purchaser’s lender shall be a necessary or proper party to the action. However, nothing herein precludes the lien claimant from asserting any claims against any party that are separate and distinct from enforcement of the lien.

Subsequent Purchaser and Lender No Longer Necessary or Proper Parties Upon Discharge of Claim of Lien After Action Is Filed. — If an action to enforce a lien under this section is commenced before the claim of lien is discharged pursuant to

G.S. 44A-16

(a)(5) or

G.S. 44A-16

(a)(6), a subsequent purchaser of the real property upon which the lien is claimed and the subsequent purchaser’s lender shall cease to be a necessary or proper party to the action, and any claim for lien enforcement asserted against the subsequent purchaser of the real property upon which the lien is claimed or the subsequent purchaser’s lender shall be dismissed upon motion of any party upon a showing that the claim of lien was discharged pursuant to G.S. 44A-16. However, nothing herein precludes the lien claimant from continuing to pursue any claims against any party that are separate and distinct from enforcement of the lien.

Bonds Prohibited From Requiring Subsequent Purchaser or Lender to Remain Parties to Action After Discharge of Claim of Lien. — The fact that a subsequent purchaser of the real property upon which the lien is claimed or the subsequent purchaser’s lender is not a party to an action to enforce a claim of lien on real property subsequent to discharge of that claim of lien by the contractor under

G.S. 44A-16

shall not invalidate the claim of lien under this Chapter, nor shall it invalidate any bond filed under

G.S. 44A-16

to discharge the claim of lien. Further, a bond filed under G.S. 44A-16(a)(6) shall not require that a subsequent purchaser of the real property upon which the lien is claimed or the subsequent purchaser’s lender remain a party to an action to enforce a claim of lien after the claim of lien has been discharged pursuant to G.S. 44A-16.

Definition of “Subsequent Purchaser.” — For purposes of this section, a “subsequent purchaser” means a party whose record interest is protected under

G.S. 47-18

, including any beneficiary of a deed of trust or mortgagee of that party, the priority of whose interest is protected under the provisions of

G.S. 47-20

, and who was not the owner of the real property at the time of the improvements giving rise to the lien claim as defined in G.S. 44A-7(6).

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 1977, c. 883; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 4, effective July 12, 2012, added subsections (d) through (h).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Mechanics’ Liens for the Improvement of Real Property: Recent Developments in Perfection, Enforcement and Priority,” see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 283 (1976).

For survey of 1977 law on civil procedure, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 874 (1978).

For note, “Judicial Activism Constructs Lenders’ Nightmare — Embree Construction Group, Inc. v. Rafcor, Inc. and United Carolina Bank,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 77 (1992).

§ 44A-14.
Sale of property in satisfaction of judgment enforcing claim of lien on real property or upon order prior to judgment; distribution of proceeds.

Execution Sale; Effect of Sale. — Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, sales under this Article and distribution of proceeds thereof shall be made in accordance with the execution sale provisions set out in

G.S. 1-339.41

through 1-339.76. The sale of real property to satisfy a claim of lien on real property granted by this Article shall pass all title and interest of the owner to the purchaser, good against all claims or interests recorded, filed or arising after the first furnishing of labor or materials at the site of the improvement by the person claiming a lien.

Sale of Property upon Order Prior to Judgment. — A resident judge of superior court in the district in which the action to enforce the claim of lien on real property is pending, a judge regularly holding the superior courts of the said district, any judge holding a session of superior court, either civil or criminal, in the said district, a special judge of superior court residing in the said district, or the chief judge of the district court in which the action to enforce the claim of lien on real property is pending, may, upon notice to all interested parties and after a hearing thereupon and upon a finding that a sale prior to judgment is necessary to prevent substantial waste, destruction, depreciation or other damage to said real property prior to the final determination of said action, order any real property against which a claim of lien on real property under this Article is asserted, sold in any manner determined by said judge to be commercially reasonable. The rights of all parties shall be transferred to the proceeds of the sale. Application for such order and further proceedings thereon may be heard in or out of session.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1.

§ 44A-15.
Attachment available to lien claimant.

In addition to other grounds for attachment, in all cases where the owner removes or attempts or threatens to remove an improvement from real property subject to a claim of lien on real property under this Article, without the written permission of the lien claimant or with the intent to deprive the lien claimant of his or her claim of lien on real property, the remedy of attachment of the property subject to the claim of lien on real property shall be available to the lien claimant or any other person.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1.

§ 44A-16.
Discharge of record claim of lien on real property.

Any claim of lien on real property filed under this Article may be discharged by any of the following methods:

The lien claimant of record, the claimant’s agent or attorney, in the presence of the clerk of superior court may acknowledge the satisfaction of the claim of lien on real property indebtedness, whereupon the clerk of superior court shall forthwith make upon the record of such claim of lien on real property an entry of such acknowledgment of satisfaction, which shall be signed by the lien claimant of record, the claimant’s agent or attorney, and witnessed by the clerk of superior court.

The owner may exhibit an instrument of satisfaction signed and acknowledged by the lien claimant of record which instrument states that the claim of lien on real property indebtedness has been paid or satisfied, whereupon the clerk of superior court shall cancel the claim of lien on real property by entry of satisfaction on the record of such claim of lien on real property.

By failure to enforce the claim of lien on real property within the time prescribed in this Article.

By filing in the office of the clerk of superior court the original or certified copy of a judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction showing that the action by the claimant to enforce the claim of lien on real property has been dismissed or finally determined adversely to the claimant.

Whenever a sum equal to the amount of the claim or claims of lien on real property claimed is deposited with the clerk of court, to be applied to the payment finally determined to be due, whereupon the clerk of superior court shall cancel the claim or claims of lien on real property or claims of lien on real property of record.

Whenever a corporate surety bond, in a sum equal to one and one-fourth times the amount of the claim or claims of lien on real property claimed and conditioned upon the payment of the amount finally determined to be due in satisfaction of said claim or claims of lien on real property, is deposited with the clerk of court, whereupon the clerk of superior court shall cancel the claim or claims of lien on real property of record.

The clerk may release funds held or a corporate surety bond upon receipt of one of the following:

Written agreement of the parties.

A final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

A consent order.

For improvements performed in conjunction with a development contract under

G.S. 143-128.1

C, a claim of lien on real property or a claim of lien on funds served on a private developer may also be discharged by the private developer and the surety on a payment bond issued under

G.S. 143-128.1

C(g)(1) in accordance with this subsection. The claim of lien may be discharged by the private developer and surety jointly filing with the clerk of superior court of the county where the project is located a copy of the payment bond together with an affidavit executed by the surety stating that, as of the date of the filing of the payment bond with the clerk of superior court, the amount of the penal sum of the payment bond minus any amounts paid in good faith to other claimants on the project and minus the amount of all other claims of lien on real property filed against the property improved by the project exceeds the amount claimed by the lien claim being discharged by at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%). Notwithstanding any other contractual provision or law, where a claimant’s lien claim has been discharged under this subsection, the claimant shall have no less than one year from the date of being served with the payment bond and affidavit to file suit on the payment bond.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 1971, c. 766; 2005-229, s. 1; 2011-411, s. 3; 2013-401, s. 6.

§ 44A-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-175, s. 5, effective January 1, 2013.

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; repealed by 2012-175, s. 5, effective January 1, 2013.

§ 44A-18.
Grant of lien upon funds; subrogation; perfection.

A first tier subcontractor who furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement shall have a lien upon funds that are owed to the contractor with whom the first tier subcontractor dealt and that arise out of the improvement on which the first tier subcontractor worked or furnished materials.

A second tier subcontractor who furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement shall have a lien upon funds that are owed to the first tier subcontractor with whom the second tier subcontractor dealt and that arise out of the improvement on which the second tier subcontractor worked or furnished materials. A second tier subcontractor, to the extent of the second tier subcontractor’s lien provided in this subdivision, shall also be subrogated to the lien upon funds of the first tier subcontractor with whom the second tier contractor dealt provided for in subdivision (1) of this section and shall perfect it by service of the notice of claim of lien upon funds to the extent of the claim.

A third tier subcontractor who furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement shall have a lien upon funds that are owed to the second tier subcontractor with whom the third tier subcontractor dealt and that arise out of the improvement on which the third tier subcontractor worked or furnished materials. A third tier subcontractor, to the extent of the third tier subcontractor’s lien upon funds provided in this subdivision, shall also be subrogated to the lien upon funds of the second tier subcontractor with whom the third tier contractor dealt and to the lien upon funds of the first tier subcontractor with whom the second tier subcontractor dealt to the extent that the second tier subcontractor is subrogated thereto, and in either case shall perfect it by service of the notice of claim of lien upon funds to the extent of the claim.

Subcontractors more remote than the third tier who furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement shall have a lien upon funds that are owed to the person with whom they dealt and that arise out of the improvement on which they furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment, but such remote tier subcontractor shall not be entitled to subrogation to the rights of other persons.

The liens upon funds granted under this section shall secure amounts earned by the lien claimant as a result of having furnished labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement under the contract to improve real property, including interest at the legal rate provided in

G.S. 24-5

, whether or not such amounts are due and whether or not performance or delivery is complete. In the event insufficient funds are retained to satisfy all lien claimants, subcontractor lien claimants may recover the interest due under this subdivision on a pro rata basis, but in no event shall interest due under this subdivision increase the liability of the obligor under

G.S. 44A-20

.

A lien upon funds granted under this section arises, attaches, and is effective immediately upon the first furnishing of labor, materials, or rental equipment at the site of the improvement by a subcontractor. Any lien upon funds granted under this section is perfected upon the giving of notice of claim of lien upon funds in writing to the obligor as provided in

G.S. 44A-19

.

Until a lien claimant gives notice of a claim of lien upon funds in writing to the obligor as provided in

G.S. 44A-19

, any owner, contractor, or subcontractor against whose interest the lien upon funds is claimed may make, receive, use, or collect payments thereon and may use such proceeds in the ordinary course of its business.

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 1985, c. 702, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 607, s. 3; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 6, effective January 1, 2013, deleted the introductory paragraph; redesignated former subdivisions (1) through (6) as present subsections (a) through (f); substituted “shall have a lien” for “shall be entitled to a lien” in subsections (a) and (d) and in the first sentence of subsections (b) and (c); in the last sentence in subsection (b), substituted “subrogated to the lien upon funds” for “entitled to be subrogated to the lien” and substituted “perfect it by service of the notice” for “be entitled to perfect it by notice”; in the last sentence of subsection (c), deleted “be entitled to” following “subdivision, shall also” near the middle, and substituted “subcontractor is subrogated thereto, and in either case shall perfect it by service of the notice of claim” for “subcontractor is entitled to be subrogated thereto, and in either case shall be entitled to perfect the same by notice of claim” near the end; rewrote subsection (f); and added subsection (g). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Mechanics’ Liens for the Improvement of Real Property: Recent Developments in Perfection, Enforcement and Priority,” see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 283 (1976).

For survey of 1977 contract law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 926 (1978).

For survey on subcontractors’ statutory lien rights, see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1996 (1992).

§ 44A-19.
Notice of claim of lien upon funds.

Notice of a claim of lien upon funds shall set forth all of the following information:

The name and address of the person claiming the lien upon funds.

A general description of the real property improved.

The name and address of the person with whom the lien claimant contracted to improve real property.

The name and address of each person against or through whom subrogation rights are claimed.

A general description of the contract and the person against whose interest the lien upon funds is claimed.

The amount of the lien upon funds claimed by the lien claimant under the contract.

All notices of claims of liens upon funds by first, second, or third tier subcontractors must be given using a form substantially as follows:

Click to view

(d)

Notices of claims of lien upon funds under this section shall be served upon the obligor by personal delivery or in any manner authorized by Rule 4 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure. A copy of the notice of claim of lien upon funds shall be attached to any claim of lien on real property filed pursuant to G.S. 44A-20(d).

(e)

Notices of claims of lien upon funds shall not be filed with the clerk of superior court and shall not be indexed, docketed, or recorded in any way as to affect title to any real property, except a notice of a claim of lien upon funds may be filed with the clerk of superior court under either of the following circumstances:

When the notice of claim of lien upon funds is attached to a claim of lien on real property filed pursuant to G.S. 44A-20(d).

When the notice of claim of lien upon funds or a copy thereof is filed by the obligor for the purpose of discharging the claim of lien upon funds in accordance with G.S. 44A-20(e).

(f)

Filing a notice of claim of lien upon funds pursuant to subsection (e) of this section is not a violation of

G.S. 44A-12.1

.

NOTICE OF CLAIM OF LIEN UPON FUNDS BY FIRST, SECOND, OR THIRD TIER SUBCONTRACTOR To: 1. , owner of property involved. (Name and address) 2. , contractor. (Name and address) 3. , first tier subcontractor against or through whom subrogation is claimed, if any. (Name and address) 4. , second tier subcontractor against or through whom subrogation is claimed, if any. (Name and address) General description of real property on which labor performed or material furnished: General description of undersigned lien claimant’s contract including the names of the parties thereto: The amount of lien upon funds claimed pursuant to the above described contract: $ The undersigned lien claimant gives this notice of claim of lien upon funds pursuant to North Carolina law and claims all rights of subrogation to which he is entitled under Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 44A of the General Statutes of North Carolina. Dated ,Lien Claimant (Address) (c) All notices of claims of liens upon funds by subcontractors more remote than the third tier must be given using a form substantially as follows: NOTICE OF CLAIM OF LIEN UPON FUNDS BY SUBCONTRACTOR MORE REMOTE THAN THE THIRD TIER To: , person holding funds against which lien upon funds is claimed. (Name and address) General description of real property on which labor performed or material furnished: General description of undersigned lien claimant’s contract including the names of the parties thereto: The amount of lien upon funds claimed pursuant to the above described contract: $ The undersigned lien claimant gives this notice of claim of lien upon funds pursuant to North Carolina law and claims all rights to which he or she is entitled under Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 44A of the General Statutes of North Carolina. Dated ,Lien Claimant (Address)

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 1985, c. 702, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 7; 2013-16, s. 3.

§ 44A-20.
Duties and liability of obligor.

Upon receipt of the notice of claim of lien upon funds provided for in this Article, the obligor shall be under a duty to retain any funds subject to the lien or liens upon funds under this Article up to the total amount of such liens upon funds as to which notices of claims of lien upon funds have been received.

If, after the receipt of the notice of claim of lien upon funds to the obligor, the obligor makes further payments to a contractor or subcontractor against whose interest the lien or liens upon funds are claimed, the lien upon funds shall continue upon the funds in the hands of the contractor or subcontractor who received the payment, and in addition the obligor shall be personally liable to the person or persons entitled to liens upon funds up to the amount of such wrongful payments, not exceeding the total claims with respect to which the notice of claim of lien upon funds was received prior to payment.

If an obligor makes a payment after receipt of notice of claim of lien on funds and incurs personal liability under subsection (b) of this section, the obligor shall be entitled to reimbursement and indemnification from the party receiving such payment.

If the obligor is an owner of the property being improved, the lien claimant shall be entitled to a claim of lien upon real property upon the interest of the obligor in the real property to the extent of the owner’s personal liability under subsection (b) of this section, which claim of lien on real property shall be enforced only in the manner set forth in

G.S. 44A-7

through

G.S. 44A-16

and which claim of lien on real property shall be entitled to the same priorities and subject to the same filing requirements and periods of limitation applicable to the contractor. The claim of lien on real property is perfected as of the time set forth in

G.S. 44A-10

upon satisfaction of those requirements set forth in

G.S. 44A-11

. A lien waiver signed by the contractor prior to a subcontractor’s perfecting its claim of lien on real property in accordance with

G.S. 44A-11

waives the subcontractor’s right to enforce the contractor’s claim of lien on real property, but does not affect the subcontractor’s right to a claim of lien on funds or the subcontractor’s right to a claim of lien on real property allowed under this subsection. The claim of lien on real property as provided under this subsection shall be in the form set out in G.S. 44A-12(c) and shall contain, in addition, a copy of the notice of claim of lien upon funds given pursuant to

G.S. 44A-19

as an exhibit together with proof of service thereof by affidavit, and shall state the grounds the lien claimant has to believe that the obligor is personally liable for the debt under subsection (b) of this section.

A notice of claim of lien upon funds under

G.S. 44A-19

may be filed by the obligor with the clerk of superior court in each county where the real property upon which the filed notice of claim of lien upon funds is located for the purpose of discharging the notice of claim of lien upon funds by any of the methods described in

G.S. 44A-16

.

A bond deposited under this section to discharge a filed notice of claim of lien upon funds shall be effective to discharge any claim of lien on real property filed by the same lien claimant pursuant to subsection (d) of this section or

G.S. 44A-23

and shall further be effective to discharge any notices of claims of lien upon funds served by lower tier subcontractors or any claims of lien on real property filed by lower tier subcontractors pursuant to subsection (d) of this section or

G.S. 44A-23

claiming through or against the contractor or higher tier subcontractors up to the amount of the bond.

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 1985, c. 702, s. 2; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 8; 2013-16, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 8, effective January 1, 2013, in subsection (d), added the third sentence, and inserted “as provided under this subsection” near the beginning of the fourth sentence. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-16, s. 4, in subsection (d), substituted “satisfaction of those requirements set forth in

G.S. 44A-11

” for “the filing of the claim of lien on real property pursuant to

G.S. 44A-12

” in the second sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “a subcontractor’s perfecting its claim of lien on real property in accordance with

G.S. 44A-11

” for “the commencement of an action to enforce a perfected claim of lien on real property granted under G.A. 44A-23.” For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 44A-21.
Pro rata payments.

Where the obligor is a contractor or subcontractor and the funds in the hands of the obligor and the obligor’s personal liability, if any, under

G.S. 44A-20

are less than the amount of valid liens upon funds that have been received by the obligor under this Article, the parties entitled to liens upon funds shall share the funds on a pro rata basis.

Where the obligor is an owner and the funds in the hands of the obligor and the obligor’s personal liability, if any, under

G.S. 44A-20

are less than the sum of the amount of valid claims of liens upon funds that have been received by the obligor under this Article and the amount of the valid claims of liens on real property upon the owner’s property filed by the subcontractors with the clerk of superior court under

G.S. 44A-23

, the parties entitled to liens upon funds and the parties entitled to subrogation claims of liens on real property upon the owner’s property shall share the funds on a pro rata basis.

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 4(d); 2005-229, s. 1.

§ 44A-22.
Priority of liens upon funds.

Liens upon funds perfected under this Article have priority over all other interests or claims theretofore or thereafter created or suffered in the funds by the person against whose interest the lien upon funds is asserted, including, but not limited to, liens arising from garnishment, attachment, levy, judgment, assignments, security interests, and any other type of transfer, whether voluntary or involuntary. Any person who receives payment from an obligor in bad faith with knowledge of a lien upon funds shall take such payment subject to the lien upon funds.

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Mechanics’ Liens for the Improvement of Real Property: Recent Developments in Perfection, Enforcement and Priority,” see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 283 (1976).

§ 44A-23.
Contractor’s claim of lien on real property; perfection of subrogation rights of subcontractor.

First tier subcontractor. — A first tier subcontractor may, to the extent of its claim, enforce the claim of lien on real property of the contractor created by Part 1 of this Article. The manner of such enforcement shall be as provided by

G.S. 44A-7

through 44A-16. The claim of lien on real property is perfected as of the time set forth in

G.S. 44A-10

upon satisfaction of those requirements set forth in

G.S. 44A-11

.

(a1)

No action of the contractor shall be effective to prejudice the rights of a first tier subcontractor without its written consent once the first tier subcontractor has perfected its claim of lien on real property in accordance with

G.S. 44A-11

.

Second or third tier subcontractor. —

A second or third tier subcontractor may, to the extent of his claim, enforce the claim of lien on real property of the contractor created by Part 1 of Article 2 of the Chapter except when:

The owner or contractor, within 30 days following the date the permit is issued for the improvement of the real property involved or within 30 days following the date the contractor is awarded the contract for the improvement of the real property involved, whichever is later, posts on the property in a visible location adjacent to the posted permit, if a permit is required, and files in the office of the clerk of superior court in each county wherein the real property to be improved is located, a completed and signed notice of contract form and the second or third tier subcontractor fails to serve upon the contractor a completed and signed notice of subcontract form by the same means of service as described in G.S. 44A-19(d); or

After the posting and filing of a signed notice of contract and the service upon the contractor of a signed notice of subcontract, the contractor serves upon the second or third tier subcontractor, within five days following each subsequent payment, by the same means of service as described in G.S. 44A-19(d), the written notice of payment setting forth the date of payment and the period for which payment is made as requested in the notice of subcontract form set forth herein.

The form of the notice of contract to be so utilized under this section shall be substantially as follows and the fee for filing the same with the clerk of superior court shall be the same as charged for filing a claim of lien on real property:

Click to view

(4)

The manner of such enforcement shall be as provided by

G.S. 44A-7

through

G.S. 44A-16

. The lien is perfected as of the time set forth in

G.S. 44A-10

upon the filing of a claim of lien on real property pursuant to

G.S. 44A-12

.

(5)

No action of the contractor shall be effective to prejudice the rights of the second or third tier subcontractor without its written consent once the second or third tier subcontractor has perfected its claim of lien on real property in accordance with

G.S. 44A-11

.

A lien waiver signed by the contractor before the occurrence of all of the actions specified in subsection (a1) and subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of this section waives the subcontractor’s right to enforce the contractor’s claim of lien on real property, but does not affect the subcontractor’s right to a claim of lien on funds or the subcontractor’s right to a claim of lien on real property allowed under G.S. 44A-20(d).

When completing the claim of lien on real property form to perfect the contractor’s claim of lien on real property, a first, second, or third tier subcontractor may use as the date upon which labor or materials were first or last furnished on the real property either any date on or after the date of the first furnishing of labor or materials on the real property, or any date on or before the date of the last furnishing of labor or materials on the real property by the subcontractor making the claim, or any date on or after the date of the first furnishing of labor or materials on the real property, or any date on or before the date of the last furnishing of labor or materials on the real property by the contractor through which the claim of lien on real property is being asserted.

‘‘NOTICE OF CONTRACT ‘‘(1) Name and address of the Contractor: ‘‘(2) Name and address of the owner of the real property at the time this Notice of Contract is recorded: ‘‘(3) General description of the real property to be improved (street address, tax map lot and block number, reference to recorded instrument, or any other description that reasonably identifies the real property): ‘‘(4) Name and address of the person, firm or corporation filing this Notice of Contract: ‘‘Dated: ‘‘Contractor ‘‘Filed this the day of ,. Clerk of Superior Court’’ (3) The form of the notice of subcontract to be so utilized under this section shall be substantially as follows: ‘‘NOTICE OF SUBCONTRACT ‘‘(1) Name and address of the subcontractor: ‘‘(2) General description of the real property on which the labor was performed or the material was furnished (street address, tax map lot and block number, reference to recorded instrument, or any description that reasonably identifies the real property): ‘‘(3) ‘‘(i) General description of the subcontractor’s contract, including the names of the parties thereto: ‘‘(ii) General description of the labor and material performed and furnished thereunder: ‘‘(4) Request is hereby made by the undersigned subcontractor that he be notified in writing by the contractor of, and within five days following, each subsequent payment by the contractor to the first tier subcontractor for labor performed or material furnished at the improved real property within the above descriptions of such in paragraph (2) and subparagraph (3)(ii), respec- tively, the date payment was made and the period for which payment is made. ‘‘Dated: Subcontractor’’

History.

1971, c. 880, s. 1; 1985, c. 702, s. 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1010, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 13; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-456, s. 59; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-158, s. 6.1; 2012-175, s. 9; 2012-194, s. 65(a), (b); 2013-16, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-158, s. 6.1, as amended by Session Laws 2012-194, s. 65.3(a), effective April 1, 2013, added the subsection (a1) and subdivision (b)(5) designations and added subdivisions (a1)(1) through (3) and (b)(5)a. to c.; deleted “Upon the filing of the claim of lien on real property, with the notice of claim of lien upon funds attached, and the commencement of the action, no” from the end of subsection (a) and subdivision (b)(4); in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a)(1) and subdivision (b)(5), added “No” at the beginning and added “upon the occurrence of all of the following” to the end; and made punctuation and stylistic changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 9, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “tier” in the subsection heading, substituted “subcontractor may” for “subcontractor, who gives notice of claim of lien upon funds as provided in this Article, may” in the introductory paragraph of subdivision (1), and substituted “The owner or contractor, within 30 days following the date the permit is issued for the improvement of the real property involved or within 30 days following the date the contractor is awarded the contract for the improvement of the real property involved, whichever is later, posts on the property in a visible location adjacent to the posted permit, if a permit is required” for “The contractor, within 30 days following the date the building permit is issued for the improvement of the real property involved, posts on the property in a visible location adjacent to the posted building permit” at the beginning of subdivision (1)a.; in the NOTICE OF SUBCONTRACT form, substituted “on which the labor” for “where the labor” in item (2) and substituted “real property” for “real property, with the notice of claim of lien upon funds attached” in the last sentence of item (4); and added subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2012-194, s. 65.3(b), effective April 1, 2013, substituted “before the occurrence of all of the actions specified in subsection (a1) and subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of this section” for “prior to the commencement of an action to enforce a perfected claim of lien on real property granted under this section” in subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-16, s. 5, in subsection (a), substituted “satisfaction of those requirements set forth in

G.S. 44A-11

” for “filing of the claim of lien on real property pursuant to

G.S. 44A-12

” at the end of third sentence, and deleted the former last sentence; rewrote subsection (a1); rewrote subdivision (b)(5);
and added subsection (d). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey on subcontractors’ statutory lien rights, see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1996 (1992).